Hawaii statutes.
§431:19-308 Applicable laws. A
sponsored captive insurance company shall be subject to this part and to part I.
If there is any conflict between this part and part I, this part shall control.
[L 2008, c 190, pt of §1; am L 2012, c 253, §21]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next